Louisiana, session 2026, HB297.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 9:3261.1(B)(2) and (6), (E)(introductory paragraph) and (2), and (H)
are hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§3261.1. Lease agreements for certain residential dwellings; domestic abuse
victims; stalking and cyberstalking
* * *
B. Definitions
* * *
(2) "Domestic abuse" means domestic abuse battery as defined in R.S.
14:35.3 provided that the domestic abuse was committed on the leased premises or
stalking or cyberstalking as defined in R.S. 14:40.2 and 40.3.
* * *
(6) "Qualified third party" means the executive director, program director,
or another employee of a community-based shelter contracted with the Department
of Children and Family Services pursuant to R.S. 46:2124, provided the employee
is a Licensed Clinical Social Worker (LCSW), or possesses a masters degree in
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 297 ENROLLED
Social Work (MSW) a licensed professional counselor, prosecuting attorney, or
investigating law enforcement officer who has personal involvement in the
investigation or prosecution of any criminal case relative to the domestic abuse or
stalking or cyberstalking.
* * *
E. Only a lessee or a household member of the lessee's residential dwelling
unit may be considered a domestic abuse victim such that the lessee may request an
accommodation under pursuant to this Section. In order for a lessee to receive an
early termination as provided in this Section, the lessee shall do all of the following:
* * *
(2) Provide to the lessor reasonable documentation that the lessee seeking
an accommodation, or that lessee's household member, was a victim of an act of
domestic abuse on the leased premises within the past thirty days. If the stalking or
cyberstalking did not occur on the leased premises, the lessee shall provide a written
declaration on why residing on the leased premises may pose a threat to the victim's
safety as provided by the certification in Subsection H of this Section.
* * *
H. A Certification of Domestic Abuse form as provided for in this Section
shall read substantially the same as follows:
(Name of qualified third party and, if applicable, the name of their shelter,
office, or agency)
I and/or my (family or household member) have suffered domestic abuse as
defined in R.S. 9:3261.1 or stalking or cyberstalking as defined in R.S.14:40.2 and
R.S. 14:40.3.
Briefly describe the incident giving rise to the claim of domestic abuse:
The incident(s) that I rely on in support of this declaration occurred on the
following date(s) and time(s): and at the following location(s):
.
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 297 ENROLLED
If the stalking or cyberstalking did not occur on the leased premises, the
reasons why continuing to reside on the leased premises may pose a threat to the
victim's safety.
The incident(s) that I rely on in support of this declaration was/were
committed by the following person(s), if known: .
I state under penalty of perjury under the laws of the state of Louisiana that
the foregoing is true and correct. By submitting this statement I do not waive any
legally recognized privilege protecting any communications that I may have with the
agency or representative whose name appears below or with any other person or
entity. I understand that my obligation to pay rent does not end until the early
termination date of my lease as decided by the lessor or until I vacate the premises
upon receiving agreement by the lessor to terminate my obligations under the lease
early. I understand that my lessor may keep my security deposit or other amounts
as permitted under law.
Dated at , Louisiana, this day of 20 .
(Signature of Lessee or Lessee's family or household member)
PRINTED NAME
I verify under penalty of perjury under the laws of the state of Louisiana that
I have provided services to the person whose signature appears above and that, based
on information communicated to me by the person whose signature appears above,
the individual or his or her family or household member has suffered domestic abuse
as defined by R.S. 9:3261.1 or stalking or cyberstalking as defined in R.S.14:40.2
and R.S. 14:40.3, and that the individual informed me of the name of the alleged
perpetrator of the actions, giving rise to the claim, if known. This verification does
not waive any legally recognized privilege that I, my agency, or any of its
representatives have with the person whose signature appears above.
Dated this day of , 20 .
(Signature of qualified third party)
PRINTED NAME
(License number or organizational tax identification number)
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 297 ENROLLED
(Organization name)
(Printed address)
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.